Utah statutes.
53A-9-101.   Purpose.

(1)  The Legislature recognizes the importance of rewarding educators who strive to improve the quality of education, of providing incentives for educators employed by the public schools to continue to pursue excellence in education, of rewarding educators who demonstrate the achievement of excellence, and of properly compensating educators who assume additional educational responsibilities.

(2)  In order to achieve these goals and to provide educators with increased opportunities for professional growth, school districts are authorized and encouraged to develop career ladder programs.

